Missouri, session 2026, SB1274.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 632.305, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 632.305,
to read as follows:
632.305. 1. An application for detention for
evaluation and treatment at a mental health facility may be
executed by any adult person, who need not be an attorney or
represented by an attorney, on a form provided by the court
for such purpose, and shall allege under oath[, without a
notarization requirement,] that the applicant has reason to
believe that the respondent is suffering from a mental
disorder and presents a likelihood of serious harm to
himself or herself or to others. The application shall
specify the factual information on which such belief is
based and should contain the names and addresses of all
persons known to the applicant who have knowledge of such
facts through personal observation.
2. The filing of a written application in court by any
adult person, who need not be an attorney or represented by
an attorney, shall authorize the applicant to bring the
matter before the court on an ex parte basis to determine
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1274 2
whether the respondent should be taken into custody and
transported to a mental health facility. The application
may be filed in the court having probate jurisdiction in any
county where the respondent may be found. If the court
finds that there is probable cause, either upon testimony
under oath or upon a review of affidavits, declarations, or
other supporting documentation, to believe that the
respondent may be suffering from a mental disorder and
presents a likelihood of serious harm to himself or herself
or others, it shall direct a peace officer to take the
respondent into custody and transport him or her to a mental
health facility for detention for evaluation and treatment
for a period not to exceed ninety-six hours unless further
detention and treatment is authorized pursuant to this
chapter. Nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit the
court, in the exercise of its discretion, from giving the
respondent an opportunity to be heard.
3. A peace officer may take a person into custody for
detention for evaluation and treatment at a mental health
facility for a period not to exceed ninety-six hours only
when such peace officer has reasonable cause to believe that
such person is suffering from a mental disorder and that the
likelihood of serious harm by such person to himself or
herself or others is imminent unless such person is
immediately taken into custody. Upon arrival at the mental
health facility, the peace officer who conveyed such person
or caused him or her to be conveyed shall either present the
application for detention for evaluation and treatment upon
which the court has issued a finding of probable cause and
the respondent was taken into custody or complete an
application for initial detention for evaluation and
treatment for a period not to exceed ninety-six hours which

SB 1274 3
shall be based upon his or her own personal observations or
investigations and shall contain the information required in
subsection 1 of this section.
4. If a person presents himself or herself or is
presented by others to a mental health facility and a
licensed physician, a registered professional nurse or a
mental health professional designated by the head of the
facility and approved by the department for such purpose has
reasonable cause to believe that the person is mentally
disordered and presents an imminent likelihood of serious
harm to himself or herself or others unless he or she is
accepted for detention, the licensed physician, the mental
health professional or the registered professional nurse
designated by the facility and approved by the department
may complete an application for detention for evaluation and
treatment for a period not to exceed ninety-six hours. The
application shall be based on his or her own personal
observations or investigation and shall contain the
information required in subsection 1 of this section.
5. No notarization shall be required for an
application or for any affidavits, declarations, or other
documents supporting an application filed pursuant to
subsections 2, 3, or 4 of this section, or filed pursuant to
subsection 1 of this section if the adult person executing
the application is an employee acting on behalf of a
hospital, as such term is defined in section 197.020. The
application and any affidavits, declarations, or other
documents supporting the application shall be subject to the
provisions of section 492.060 allowing for declaration under
penalty of perjury.
✓